Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.904

Transfer of certain state energy office powers, duties, and functions—References to director—Appointment of assistant director.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office relating to energy resource policy and planning and energy facility siting are transferred to the department of commerce. All references to the director or the state energy office in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of commerce when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

The director shall appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy policy staff shall have no additional responsibilities beyond activities concerning energy policy.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of commerce. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, database, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the department of commerce.

(b) Any appropriations made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and credited to the department of commerce.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, software, database, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the state energy office engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of commerce. All employees engaged in energy facility site evaluation council duties classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of commerce to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of commerce. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of commerce.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(7) The department of commerce shall direct the closure of the financial records of the state energy office.

(8) Responsibility for implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs rests with Washington State University. The department of commerce shall provide Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs under an interagency agreement with the department of commerce. The interagency agreement shall also outline the working relationship between the department of commerce and Washington State University as it pertains to the relationship between energy policy development and public outreach. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant, contract, or fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs directly from other entities.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2082; 1996 c 186 s 101.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Findings—Intent—1996 c 186: "The legislature finds responsibilities of state government need to be limited to core services in support of public safety and welfare. Services provided by the Washington state energy office are primarily advisory and can be eliminated. The legislature further finds a need to redefine the state's role in energy-related regulatory functions. The state may be better served by allowing regulatory functions to be performed by other appropriate entities, simplifying state government while maintaining core services. Further, it is the intent of the legislature that the state continue to receive oil overcharge restitution funds for our citizens while every effort is being made to maximize federal funds available for energy conservation purposes." [ 1996 c 186 s 1.]

Part headings not law—1996 c 186: "Part headings used in this act do not constitute part of the law." [ 1996 c 186 s 602.]

Effective date—1996 c 186: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1996." [ 1996 c 186 s 603.]